test/src/morphology/verbIVpárra-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/geasjmator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/geasjmator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# even-syllable intransitve verbs -a, -e. Lexicon RAVGGAT_IV, ASSTAT_IV, VIEDJET_IV

Tests:
  Verb - assjmat: # RAVGGAT_IV
    assjmat+V+TV+Inf: asstat 
    assjmat+V+TV+Sup: assjmatjit
    assjmat+V+TV+Ger: assjmadijn
    assjmat+V+TV+PrfPrc: assjmam
    assjmat+V+TV+Actio+Ess: assjmamin
    assjmat+V+TV+Actio+Ela: assjmamis
    assjmat+V+TV+VAbess: asjmak
    assjmat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: asjmav
    assjmat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: asjma
    assjmat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nærrá
    assjmat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: assjmin 
    assjmat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: assjmabihtte
    assjmat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: assjmaba
    assjmat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: assjmap 
    assjmat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: assjmabihtit
    assjmat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: assjmi
    assjmat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: assjmiv
    assjmat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: assjmi
    assjmat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: asjmaj
    assjmat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: asjmajma
    assjmat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: asjmajda
    assjmat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: asjmajga
    assjmat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: asjmajma 
    assjmat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: asjmajda
    assjmat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: assjmin
    assjmat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: asjma
    assjmat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: assjmis
    assjmat+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: assjmon 
    assjmat+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: nærre
    assjmat+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: assjmiska
    assjmat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: assjmup
    assjmat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: assjmut
    assjmat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: assjmusa
    assjmat+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: asjmatjav
    assjmat+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: asjmatja
    assjmat+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: asjmasj
    assjmat+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: asjmatji

  Verb - biedat: # RAVGGAT
    biedat+V+IV+Inf: biedat
    biedat+V+IV+Sup: biedatjit
    biedat+V+IV+Ger: biedadijn
    biedat+V+IV+PrfPrc: biedam
    biedat+V+IV+Actio+Ess: biedamin
    biedat+V+IV+Actio+Ela: biedamis
    biedat+V+IV+VAbess: biedak
    biedat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: biedav
    biedat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: bieda
    biedat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: biedabihtit
    biedat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: biedi
    biedat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: biediv
    biedat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: biedi
    biedat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: biedaj
    biedat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: biedajma 
    biedat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: biedajda
    biedat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: biedajga
    biedat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: bieda
    biedat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: biedis
    biedat+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: biedon 
    biedat+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: biedde
    biedat+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: biediska
    biedat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: biedup
    biedat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: biedut
    biedat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: biedusa
    biedat+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: biedatjav
    biedat+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: biedatja
    biedat+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: biedasj
    biedat+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: biedatji

  Verb - doajmmat: # RAVGGAT_IV
    doajmmat+V+IV+Inf: doajmmat 
    doajmmat+V+IV+Sup: dåjmatjit
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ger: dåjmadijn
    doajmmat+V+IV+PrfPrc: doajmmam
    doajmmat+V+IV+Actio+Ess: doajmmamin
    doajmmat+V+IV+Actio+Ela: doajmmamis
    doajmmat+V+IV+VAbess: dåjmak
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: dåjmav
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: dåjma
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: doajmmá
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: doajmmin 
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: doajmmabihtte
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: doajmmaba
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: doajmmap 
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: doajmmabihtit
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: doajmmi
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: doajmmiv
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: doajmmi
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: dåjmaj
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: dåjmajma 
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: dåjmajda
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: dåjmajga
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: dåjmajma 
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: dåjmajda
    doajmmat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: doajmmin
    doajmmat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: dåjma
    doajmmat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: doajmmis
    doajmmat+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: doajmmon 
    doajmmat+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: doajmme
    doajmmat+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: doajmmiska
    doajmmat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: doajmmup
    doajmmat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: doajmmut
    doajmmat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: doajmmusa
    doajmmat+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: dåjmatjav
    doajmmat+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: dåjmatja
    doajmmat+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: dåjmasj
    doajmmat+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: dåjmatji

  Verb - asstat: # ASSTAT_IV
    asstat+V+IV+Inf: asstat 
    asstat+V+IV+Sup: astatjit
    asstat+V+IV+Ger: astadijn
    asstat+V+IV+PrfPrc: asstam
    asstat+V+IV+Actio+Ess: asstamin
    asstat+V+IV+Actio+Ela: asstamis
    asstat+V+IV+VAbess: astak
    asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: astav
    asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: asta
    asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: asstabihtit
    asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: assti
    asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: asstiv
    asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: assti
    asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: astaj
    asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: astajma 
    asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: astajda
    asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: astajga
    asstat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: asta
    asstat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: asstis
    asstat+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: asston 
    asstat+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: asste
    asstat+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: asstiska
    asstat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: asstup
    asstat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: asstut
    asstat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: asstusa
    asstat+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: astatjav
    asstat+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: astatja
    asstat+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: astasj
    asstat+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: astatji

  Verb - biegget: # BUOLLET_IV
    biegget+V+IV+Inf: biegget 
    biegget+V+IV+Sup: bækkátjit
    biegget+V+IV+Ger: biekkedijn
    biegget+V+IV+PrfPrc: bæggám
    biegget+V+IV+Actio+Ess: bieggemin
    biegget+V+IV+Actio+Ela: bieggemis
    biegget+V+IV+VAbess: biekkek
    biegget+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: bækkáv
    biegget+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: bækká
    biegget+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: bieggebihtit
    biegget+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: bieggi
    biegget+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: bieggiv
    biegget+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: bieggi
    biegget+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: biekkij
    biegget+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: biekkijma 
    biegget+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: biekkijda
    biegget+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: biekkijga
    biegget+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: biekke
    biegget+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: bieggis
    biegget+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: bæggon 
    biegget+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: biegge
    biegget+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: bieggiska
    biegget+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: bæggup
    biegget+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: bæggut
    biegget+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: bæggusa
    biegget+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: biekkitjav
    biegget+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: biekkitja
    biegget+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: biekkisj
    biegget+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: biekkitji

  Verb - boahtet: # BUOLLET_IV
    boahtet+V+IV+Inf: boahtet 
    boahtet+V+IV+Sup: boadátjit
    boahtet+V+IV+Ger: boadedijn
    boahtet+V+IV+PrfPrc: boahtám
    boahtet+V+IV+Actio+Ess: boahtemin
    boahtet+V+IV+Actio+Ela: boahtemis
    boahtet+V+IV+VAbess: boadek
    boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: boadáv
    boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: boadá
    boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: boahtebihtit
    boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: boahti
    boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: boahtiv
    boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: boahti
    boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: bådij
    boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: bådijma 
    boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: bådijda
    boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: bådijga
    boahtet+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: boade
    boahtet+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: boahtis
    boahtet+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: boahton 
    boahtet+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: boahte
    boahtet+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: boahtiska
    boahtet+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: boahtup
    boahtet+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: boahtut
    boahtet+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: boahtusa
    boahtet+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: båditjav
    boahtet+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: båditja
    boahtet+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: bådisj
    boahtet+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: båditji

  Verb - huvkket: # BUOLLET_IV
    huvkket+V+IV+Inf: huvkket 
    huvkket+V+IV+Sup: huvkátjit
    huvkket+V+IV+Ger: huvkedijn
    huvkket+V+IV+PrfPrc: huvkkám
    huvkket+V+IV+Actio+Ess: huvkkemin
    huvkket+V+IV+Actio+Ela: huvkkemis
    huvkket+V+IV+VAbess: huvkek
    huvkket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huvkáv
    huvkket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: huvká
    huvkket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: huvkkebihtit
    huvkket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: huvkki
    huvkket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: huvkkiv
    huvkket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: huvkki
    huvkket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: huvkij
    huvkket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: huvkijma 
    huvkket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: huvkijda
    huvkket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: huvkijga
    huvkket+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: huvke
    huvkket+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: huvkkis
    huvkket+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: huvkkon 
    huvkket+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: huvkkte
    huvkket+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: huvkkiska
    huvkket+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: huvkkup
    huvkket+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: huvkkut
    huvkket+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: huvkkusa
    huvkket+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: huvkitjav
    huvkket+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: huvkitja
    huvkket+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: huvkisj
    huvkket+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: huvkitji

  Verb - biegget: # JIEHKET_TV
    biegget+V+TV+Inf: biegget 
    biegget+V+TV+Sup: bækkátjit
    biegget+V+TV+Ger: biekkedijn
    biegget+V+TV+PrfPrc: bæggám
    biegget+V+TV+Actio+Ess: bieggemin
    biegget+V+TV+Actio+Ela: bieggemis
    biegget+V+TV+VAbess: biekkek
    biegget+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: bækkáv
    biegget+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: bækká
    biegget+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: bieggebihtit
    biegget+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: bieggi
    biegget+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: bieggiv
    biegget+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: bieggi
    biegget+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: biekkij
    biegget+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: biekkijma 
    biegget+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: biekkijda
    biegget+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: biekkijga
    biegget+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: biekke
    biegget+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: bieggis
    biegget+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: bæggon 
    biegget+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: biegge
    biegget+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: bieggiska
    biegget+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: beggup
    biegget+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: beggut
    biegget+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: beggusa
    biegget+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: biekkitjav
    biegget+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: biekkitja
    biegget+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: biekkisj
    biegget+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: biekkitji

  Verb - huvkket: # huvkkET_TV
    huvkket+V+TV+Inf: huvkket 
    huvkket+V+TV+Sup: huvkátjit
    huvkket+V+TV+Ger: huvkedijn
    huvkket+V+TV+PrfPrc: huvkkám
    huvkket+V+TV+Actio+Ess: huvkkemin
    huvkket+V+TV+Actio+Ela: huvkkemis
    huvkket+V+TV+VAbess: huvkek
    huvkket+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huvkáv
    huvkket+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: huvká
    huvkket+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: huvkkebihtit
    huvkket+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: huvkki
    huvkket+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: huvkkiv
    huvkket+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: huvkki
    huvkket+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: huvkij
    huvkket+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: huvkijma 
    huvkket+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: huvkijda
    huvkket+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: huvkijga
    huvkket+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: huvke
    huvkket+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: huvkkis
    huvkket+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: huvkkon 
    huvkket+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: huvkke
    huvkket+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: huvkkiska
    huvkket+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: huvkkup
    huvkket+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: huvkkut
    huvkket+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: huvkkusa
    huvkket+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: huvkitjav
    huvkket+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: huvkitja
    huvkket+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: huvkisj
    huvkket+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: huvkitji

  Verb - biehket: # VIEDJET_IV
    biehket+V+IV+Inf: biehket 
    biehket+V+IV+Sup: bægátjit
    biehket+V+IV+Ger: biegedijn
    biehket+V+IV+PrfPrc: bæhkám
    biehket+V+IV+Actio+Ess: biehkemin
    biehket+V+IV+Actio+Ela: biehkemis
    biehket+V+IV+VAbess: biegek
    biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: bægáv
    biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: bægá
    biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: biehkebihtit
    biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: biehki
    biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: biehkiv
    biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: biehki
    biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: biegij
    biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: biegijma 
    biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: biegijda
    biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: biegijga
    biehket+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: biege
    biehket+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: biehkis
    biehket+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: bæhkon 
    biehket+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: biehke
    biehket+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: biehkiska
    biehket+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: behkup
    biehket+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: behkut
    biehket+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: behkusa
    biehket+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: biegitjav
    biehket+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: biegitja
    biehket+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: biegisj
    biehket+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: biegitji
